Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.375

Acquisition of control of association—Application to foreign association branches.

RCW 33.24.345, 33.24.350, 33.24.360, and 33.24.370 do not apply to foreign associations doing business in this state, except when an acquiring party intends to acquire only one or more branches of a foreign association which are located in this state.

[ 1982 c 3 s 56.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.